Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.411

Use of license fees—Pesticide safety education program—Deposit of money collected for civil penalties.

(1) Except as otherwise provided for in this section, all license fees collected under this chapter shall be paid to the director for use exclusively in the enforcement of this chapter.

(2) In addition to any other fees the department may collect under this chapter, the department shall collect a fee of seven dollars for each license issued by the department under this chapter. The department shall transmit the seven dollar fee required by this subsection to Washington State University for the purpose of providing a pesticide safety education program to educate and train pesticide licensees and prospective licensees.

(3) The department shall engage with the regulated community on the status of license fees established in this chapter, including consideration of future increases, in coordination with a stakeholder work group.

(4) All moneys collected for civil penalties levied under this chapter shall be deposited in the state general fund.

[ 2021 c 244 s 7; 1997 c 242 s 8; 1995 c 374 s 67.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 244: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.